apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="Vov/es__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>es</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>se</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>se</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sovi</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sovi</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sem</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sové</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>se</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sů</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sům</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sech</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>si</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sové</l><r>es<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mělní/k__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>k</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>k</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ka</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kem</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ke</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ků</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kum</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kům</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cích</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kách</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kech</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kama</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r>k<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Zdic/e__np_f">
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ím</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ích</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ema</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>emi</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Pierr/e__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>e<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ot/o__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ové</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ů</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ům</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ech</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ové</l><r>o<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Beřkovice"><i>Beřkovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Bohnice"><i>Bohnic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Bohuslavice"><i>Bohuslavic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Bojanovice"><i>Bojanovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Bolatice"><i>Bolatic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Boskovice"><i>Boskovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Buchlovice"><i>Buchlovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Bučovice"><i>Bučovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Bílovice"><i>Bílovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Bělkovice"><i>Bělkovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Chanovice"><i>Chanovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Chvaletice"><i>Chvaletic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Dačice"><i>Dačic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Dobřichovice"><i>Dobřichovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Doubravice"><i>Doubravic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Drnovice"><i>Drnovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Dubrovník"><i>Dubrovní</i><par n="Mělní/k__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Dětmarovice"><i>Dětmarovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Fryčovice"><i>Fryčovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Hartmanice"><i>Hartmanic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Hodkovice"><i>Hodkovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Holice"><i>Holic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Hostivice"><i>Hostivic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Hořice"><i>Hořic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Hoštice"><i>Hoštic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Hranice"><i>Hranic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Hrotovice"><i>Hrotovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Husovice"><i>Husovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Janovice"><i>Janovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Jindřichovice"><i>Jindřichovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Karlovice"><i>Karlovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Katovice"><i>Katovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Klimkovice"><i>Klimkovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Kobeřice"><i>Kobeřic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Kounice"><i>Kounic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Košíře"><i>Košíř</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Kralovice"><i>Kralovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Královice"><i>Královic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Kunratice"><i>Kunratic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Kunčicee"><i>Kunčice</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Kylešovice"><i>Kylešovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Křešice"><i>Křešic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Ledvice"><i>Ledvic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Libochovice"><i>Libochovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Loučovice"><i>Loučovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Luhačovice"><i>Luhačovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Malšovice"><i>Malšovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Milovice"><i>Milovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Morkovice"><i>Morkovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Mutěnice"><i>Mutěnic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Mělník"><i>Mělní</i><par n="Mělní/k__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Nechanice"><i>Nechanic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Netolice"><i>Netolic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Opatovice"><i>Opatovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Oto"><i>Ot</i><par n="Ot/o__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Pavlovice"><i>Pavlovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Pierre"><i>Pierr</i><par n="Pierr/e__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Pohořelice"><i>Pohořelic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Prachatice"><i>Prachatic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Průhonice"><i>Průhonic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Přešťovice"><i>Přešťovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Rajnochovice"><i>Rajnochovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Rudice"><i>Rudic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Semice"><i>Semic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Slušovice"><i>Slušovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Strahovice"><i>Strahovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Střešovice"><i>Střešovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Svéradice"><i>Svéradic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Trmice"><i>Trmic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Těšetice"><i>Těšetic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Třebovice"><i>Třebovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Velenice"><i>Velenic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Vlachovice"><i>Vlachovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Voves"><i>Vov</i><par n="Vov/es__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Vrahovice"><i>Vrahovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Vršovice"><i>Vršovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Zubrnice"><i>Zubrnic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Častolovice"><i>Častolovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Čelákovice"><i>Čelákovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Černošice"><i>Černošic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Řečkovice"><i>Řečkovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Štramberk"><i>Štramber</i><par n="Mělní/k__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Štěnovice"><i>Štěnovic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Žeravice"><i>Žeravic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Žlutice"><i>Žlutic</i><par n="Zdic/e__np_f"/></e>
